Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska69-111
Security interest; personal property; failure to account or produce for inspection; penalty.

Any person who, after having created any security interest in any article of personal property, whether presently owned or after-acquired, for the benefit of another, shall, during the existence of the lien or title of such security interest, fail to give, from time to time upon the demand of the holder of the security interest, an accounting for such property, or who, when the holder of the security interest has reason to believe his security insufficient or when the creator of the security interest requests an extension of the time of payment, shall fail, on demand of the holder of the security interest or his agent, to identify and exhibit for inspection the property covered by the security interest at reasonable hours; or who, in case of loss or death of such articles covered by the security interest, shall fail to produce within ten days after knowledge of the loss or death, notice in writing to the holder of the security interest of such death or loss, shall be deemed guilty of a misdemeanor, and upon conviction thereof shall be fined in any sum not less than five dollars nor more than one hundred dollars, or imprisoned in the county jail not exceeding thirty days.

Laws 1917, c. 204, § 1, p. 482;

C.S.1922, § 427;

Laws 1927, c. 37, § 1, p. 166;

C.S.1929, § 69-111;

Laws 1941, c. 136, § 1, p. 541;

C.S.Supp.,1941, § 69-111;

R.S.1943, § 69-111;

Laws 1969, c. 543, § 4, p. 2195;

Laws 1971, LB 961, § 4.